Hawaii statutes.
§29-14 Boards, etc., may accept funds,
comply with federal acts. Except as otherwise provided by law, any board,
commission, department, or officer of the State may accept and receive on
behalf of the State, and receipt for, any and all grants or allotments of
federal-aid moneys made available to the State by or pursuant to an act of
Congress, and enter into or make such plan, agreement, or other arrangement
with the agency designated by the act of Congress as is necessary to carry out
the purposes of the Act; provided that if as a condition to receiving the
federal-aid moneys it is necessary to match all or any part of the grant or
allotment with state moneys no plan, agreement, or arrangement may be entered
into unless the board, commission, department, or officer has under its or the
officer's control moneys which may be expended lawfully for the purpose.

The governor may transfer funds from the
department of health to the department of human services and from the
department of human services to the department of labor and industrial
relations to obtain additional federal funds for medical assistance under Title
XIX of the Social Security Act, as amended, and the work incentive program.
The governor may also transfer funds from one department to another for the
purpose of obtaining federal matching grants and allotments; provided that the
state moneys have been appropriated for the purpose for which federal grants
and allotments may be obtained. [L 1939, c 196, §2; RL 1945, §402; RL 1955,
§12-4; HRS §29-14; am L 1969, c 65, §1; am L 1970, c 105, §5; gen ch 1985; am L
1987, c 339, §4]

Revision Note

The words "and industrial relations" added to
"department of labor".

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next